Mississippi, session 2026, SB2519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Get to School and Stay Safe Act of 2026." SECTION 2. (1)  Legislative findings.  The Legislature finds that early identification of student risk and coordinated intervention, consistent with applicable state and federal privacy law, improves student safety, reduces violence, and supports school attendance and student success. (2)  Definitions.  As used in this section: (a)  "Authorized district user" means only: the district superintendent, assistant superintendents, and principals of a school attended by the student, as designated in writing by the superintendent. (b) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (c) "Juvenile" means any student enrolled in a Mississippi school who is not older than compulsory school attendance age. (d)  "Local law enforcement" means the arresting authority within the same county of the juvenile's school district. (e)  "Portal" means the secure statewide online system established under this section. (f)  "Portal entry designee" means a district-appointed individual responsible for timely entry of required information into the portal under subsection (4)(e) of this section. (g)  "Student safety risk assessment" means a documented assessment by a school district regarding a student's behavior or circumstances indicating a potential risk of harm to self or others, including a threat assessment, protective risk review, or comparable locally adopted process. (3)  Establishment; administration; coordination with courts.  (a)  The department shall develop, house, host, maintain, and administer the portal and shall be responsible for system security, uptime, user provisioning, audit logging, and technical support standards. (b)  The department shall coordinate, by memorandum of understanding (MOU) and in consultation with the Administrative Office of Courts and youth court stakeholders, to enable secure information exchange between school districts and the juvenile court system to the extent permitted by law, court order, and court rules. (c)  The portal must support entry of the fact that a student safety risk assessment has occurred. The portal shall not require entry of clinical diagnoses or detailed medical records. (d)  Each school district shall ensure that an entry reflecting the occurrence of a student safety risk assessment is entered into the portal not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the district sends or refers a student for a student safety risk assessment, regardless of whether the assessment is conducted by district personnel or an external provider.  If the forty-eight-hour deadline falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday observed by the district, the entry shall be made not later than the next business day.  For purposes of this paragraph, "business day" means a day on which the administrative offices of the district are open for business. (4)  Limited access; privacy protections.  (a)  Only authorized district users may access student-specific information in the portal for students enrolled in the user's district. (b)  The department may designate a limited number of state employees as system administrators for user provisioning, cybersecurity, audit, compliance, and technical support.  However, such administrators shall not access student-specific content except as necessary to investigate a documented security or integrity incident. (c)  Each authorized district user shall complete annual training approved by the department addressing confidentiality, appropriate use, and cybersecurity. (d)  Access shall be promptly revoked upon separation from employment, reassignment, or superintendent revocation. (e)  Portal entry designee; backups; restricted permissions.  (i)  Each district superintendent shall appoint one (1) primary portal entry designee responsible for timely entry of information required by subsection (3) of this section and shall appoint not fewer than two (2) alternate designees to serve as backups when the primary designee is unavailable.  The designee and alternates may include a counselor, principal, administrator, or other district employee designated by the superintendent. (ii)  The portal shall support a restricted "data-entry" permission level for the portal entry designee and alternate designees, limited to creating and updating entries required by subsection (3) of this section for students enrolled in the district, and prohibiting browsing or viewing student-specific entries beyond what is necessary for completing or correcting the required entry. (iii)  The department shall require execution of user agreements for all portal users and shall maintain audit logs sufficient to identify user access and edits. (5)  Confidentiality; nonpublic record; authorized uses.  (a)  Information entered into or generated by the portal is confidential and exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. (b)  Portal information shall be used only for: (i)  Student safety planning and coordinated intervention; (ii)  Ensuring continuity of services when a student transfers within Mississippi; (iii)  Coordination with youth court and service providers as authorized by law; and (iv)  Compulsory attendance enforcement and related student-support interventions. (c)  Unauthorized access, use, or disclosure is grounds for discipline and is punishable under applicable criminal and civil laws. (d)  Entries shall be limited to the minimum necessary fields required by subsection (3) of this section and shall not include detailed narrative medical or mental-health information. (6)  Interagency information sharing for safety and services.  To the extent not prohibited by state or federal law, and subject to any required court order or court rule, state and local agencies and programs providing services to students, including school districts, local law enforcement, youth court intake, and other child-serving entities, may share records or information through the portal when reasonably necessary to ensure access to appropriate services for the student or to ensure the safety of the student or others.  The department shall promulgate minimum necessary standards and role-based access controls consistent with this section. (7)  Data quality; review and correction.  (a)  A parent or legal guardian, or an eligible student as defined by applicable federal law, may submit a written request to the district superintendent for review of factual inaccuracies in portal entries originating from the district. (b)  The superintendent shall provide a written determination within thirty (30) days and shall correct or annotate the record as appropriate. (8)  Retention and destruction.  The department shall adopt a retention schedule limiting retention of portal entries to the minimum period needed for safety and continuity of interventions, consistent with applicable law and records-management requirements. (9)  Reporting; audit. The department shall publish an annual aggregate report to the Legislature that excludes personally identifiable student information and includes cybersecurity compliance and aggregate counts of risk assessments documented. (10)  BTAM training for district leadership (training-only approach).  (a)  The department shall develop or procure Behavioral Threat Assessment and Management (BTAM) training, including online modules and periodic in-person options. (b)  Each district superintendent, assistant superintendent, and school principal shall complete BTAM training within twelve (12) months of assuming the role and at least once every two (2) years thereafter. (c)  Nothing in this section mandates a particular local team composition, meeting frequency, or other operational requirements beyond training.  Districts may use locally adopted processes consistent with department guidance. (11)  Juvenile felony arrest notification to school district.  (a)  A local law enforcement agency shall notify a juvenile's school district of a juvenile felony arrest within twenty-four (24) hours of the arrest. (b)  Notification may be transmitted through the portal established in this section, if available, and shall be treated as confidential student safety information. SECTION 3.  Section 37-13-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-85.  The Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement shall have the following powers and duties, in addition to all others imposed or granted by law: (a)  To establish any policies or guidelines * * * concerning to be used by local school districts for the employment of school attendance officers which serve to effectuate a uniform system of enforcement under the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law throughout the state * * *, and to designate the number of school attendance officers which shall be employed to serve in each school district area; * * *  (b)  To supervise and assist school attendance officer supervisors in the performance of their duties; ( * * *cb)  To establish minimum standards for enrollment and attendance for the state and each individual school district, and to monitor the success of the state and districts in achieving the required levels of performance; ( * * *dc)  To provide to school districts failing to meet the established standards for enrollment and attendance assistance in reducing absenteeism or the dropout rates in those districts; ( * * *ed)  To establish any qualifications, in addition to those required under Section 37-13-89, for school attendance officers as the office deems necessary to further the purposes of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; ( * * *fe)  To develop and implement a system under which school districts are required to maintain accurate records that document enrollment and attendance in such a manner that the records reflect all changes in enrollment and attendance, and to require school attendance officers to submit information concerning public school attendance on a monthly basis to the office; ( * * *gf)  To prepare the form of the certificate of enrollment required under the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law and to furnish a sufficient number of the certificates of enrollment to each school attendance officer in the state; ( * * *hg)  To provide to the State Board of Education statistical information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems as requested by the State Board of Education; ( * * *ih)  To provide for the certification of school attendance officers; ( * * *ji)  To provide for a course of training and education for school attendance officers, and to require successful completion of the course as a prerequisite to certification by the office as school attendance officers; ( * * *kj)  To adopt any guidelines or policies the office deems necessary to effectuate an orderly transition from the supervision of school attendance officers by * * * district attorneys the State Department of Education to the supervision by the local school * * * attendance officer supervisors district; * * *  (l)  Beginning on July 1, 1998, to require school attendance officer supervisors to employ persons employed by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, as school attendance officers without requiring such persons to submit an application or interview for employment with the State Department of Education; ( * * *mk)  To adopt policies or guidelines to assist school districts with linking the duties of school attendance officers to the appropriate courts, law enforcement agencies and community service providers; * * * and ( * * *nl)  To adopt any other policies or guidelines that the office deems necessary for the enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, the policies or guidelines shall not add to or contradict with the requirements of Section 37-13-91 * * *.; and (m)  To transfer all funds appropriated to the State Department of Education for school attendance officers to school districts on the same schedule as total funding formula disbursements under Section 37-151-103. SECTION 4.  Section 37-13-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-87. * * *  (1)  The Director of the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement shall employ three (3) school attendance officer supervisors, each to maintain an office within a different Supreme Court district. Each supervisor shall be responsible  The State Superintendent of Public Education shall employ sufficient staff to provide oversight and guidance for the enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law * * * within his district and shall exercise direct supervision over and shall support and provide technical assistance and professional development to the school attendance officers in the local school district.  The * * * supervisors, who shall report to the director of the office, staff employed by the State Superintendent of Public Education shall assist the school attendance officers in the performance of their duties as established by law or otherwise and may also perform any other duties within the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement as may be assigned by the State Superintendent of Public Education.  Duties include, but are not limited to, the implementation of proper data collection and the training of school district staff. * * * (2)  No person having less than eight (8) years combined actual experience as a school attendance officer, school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field, and/or social worker in the state shall be employed as a school attendance officer supervisor.  Further, a school attendance officer supervisor shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987.  School attendance officers shall meet any additional qualifications established by the State Personnel Board for school attendance officers or school attendance officer supervisors.  The school attendance officer supervisors shall receive an annual salary to be set by the State Superintendent of Public Education, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board. SECTION 5.  Section 37-13-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-89.  (1)  (a) In each school district within the state, there shall be employed the number of school attendance officers determined by the local school district, in consultation with the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement, to be necessary to adequately enforce * * * the provisions of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, this number shall not exceed one hundred fifty-three (153) school attendance officers at any time.  From and after July 1, * * * 1998 2026, all school attendance officers employed pursuant to this section shall be employees of the * * * State Department of Education.  The State Department of Education school districts, which shall employ all persons employed as school attendance officers by * * * district attorneys before July 1, 1998 the State Department of Education before July 1, 2026, and shall assign them to school attendance responsibilities in the school district in which they were employed before July 1, * * * 1998 2026. * * *  The first twelve (12) months of employment for each school attendance officer shall be the probationary period of state service. As district employees, school attendance officers shall be supervised and evaluated by the district superintendent, subject to oversight by the local school board. (b)  If a school attendance officer employed by the State Department of Education performed services in two (2) or more school districts during the 2025-2026 school year, that school attendance officer may continue to serve the same two (2) or more districts for the 2026-2027 school year.  For purposes of employment, the school attendance officer shall be assigned to the district with the largest student enrollment, and that district shall serve as the fiscal agent, with funding shared with the partnering district.  Effective on July 1, 2026, if two (2) or more districts fall below a certain number of students enrolled, to be determined by the State Department of Education, or are provided funding for only one-half (1/2) of the salary of the school attendance officer, those district are authorized, in the discretion of their respective local school boards, to enter into an agreement for the purposes of sharing a school attendance officer.  The agreement shall designate the district to serve as the fiscal agent, as well as the mutually agreed-upon salary for the school attendance officer.  The agreement shall be adopted by resolution duly spread on the minutes of each school board and approved by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement. (2)  (a)  The * * * State Department of Education local school district shall * * * obtain current conduct criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks on all persons applying for the position of school attendance officer on or after July * * * 2, 2002 1, 2026.  The criminal records information and registry checks must be kept on file for any new hires. * * *  In order  To determine an applicant's suitability for employment as a school attendance officer, the applicant must be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for a national criminal history record check. The applicant shall pay the fee, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00), for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check; however, the * * * State Department of Education school district, in its discretion, may pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances may a member of the * * * State Board of Education school board, employee of the * * * State Department of Education school district or any person other than the subject of the criminal records background check disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this subsection. (b)  If the fingerprinting or criminal records check discloses a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the applicant is not eligible to be employed as a school attendance officer.  Any employment of an applicant pending the results of the fingerprinting and criminal records check is voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal records check. However, the * * * State Board of Education school board, in its discretion, may allow an applicant aggrieved by an employment decision under this subsection to appear before the board, or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the new hire to be employed as a school attendance officer.  The * * * State Board of Education school board may grant waivers for mitigating circumstances, which may include, but are not necessarily limited to:  (i) age at which the crime was committed; (ii) circumstances surrounding the crime; (iii) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (iv) work history; (v) current employment and character references; and (vi) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the responsibilities of a school attendance officer competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of children. (c) * * *  A  No school district, district employee, member of the State Board of Education or employee of a school under the purview of the State * * * Department Board of Education * * * may not shall be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made under state law regarding an employment decision authorized under this section. (3)  Each school attendance officer shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have no less than three (3) years combined actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree, and/or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987.  School attendance officers also shall satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the State Personnel Board for the position of school attendance officer.  School attendance officers also shall satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the hiring local school district. (4)  It shall be the duty of each school attendance officer to: (a)  Cooperate with any public agency to locate and identify all compulsory-school-age children who are not attending school; (b)  Cooperate with all courts of competent jurisdiction; (c)  Investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children not enrolled in a nonpublic school; (d)  Provide appropriate counseling to encourage all school-age children to attend school until they have completed high school; (e)  Attempt to secure the provision of social or welfare services that may be required to enable any child to attend school; (f)  Contact the home or place of residence of a compulsory-school-age child and any other place in which the officer is likely to find any compulsory-school-age child when the child is absent from school during school hours without a valid written excuse from school officials, and when the child is found, the officer shall notify the parents and school officials as to where the child was physically located; (g)  Contact promptly the home of each compulsory-school-age child in the school district within the officer's jurisdiction who is not enrolled in school or is not in attendance at public school and is without a valid written excuse from school officials; if no valid reason is found for the nonenrollment or absence from the school, the school attendance officer shall give written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance; (h)  Collect and maintain information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems, as may be required by law, the school district or the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement; and (i)  Perform all other duties relating to compulsory school attendance established by the State Department of Education or district school attendance supervisor, or both. (5)  While engaged in the performance of his duties, each school attendance officer shall carry on his person a badge identifying him as a school attendance officer * * * under the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education and an identification card designed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and issued by the school attendance officer supervisor.  Neither the badge nor the identification card shall bear the name of any elected public official. (6)  The state shall provide funding for one (1) school attendance officer employed by a school district or districts for every three thousand (3,000) compulsory-school-aged children, as defined in Section 37-13-91(2)(f), in enrollment in the public schools of the county, for the purpose of employing school attendance officers as defined in Section 37-13-91(2)(g). ( * * *67)  The State Personnel Board shall develop a salary scale for school attendance officers as part of the variable compensation plan.  The various pay ranges of the salary scale shall be based upon factors including, but not limited to, education, professional certification and licensure, and number of years of experience.  School attendance officers shall be paid in accordance with this salary scale, but school districts may pay, from local funds, additional compensation above the minimum salary on a schedule established by the school board.  The minimum salaries under the scale shall be no less than the following: (a)  For school attendance officers holding a bachelor's degree or any other attendance officer who does not hold such a degree, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $24,528.29 5 - 8 years 26,485.29 9 - 12 years 28,050.89 13 - 16 years 29,616.49 Over 17 years 31,182.09 (b)  For school attendance officers holding a license as a social worker, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $25,558.29 5 - 8 years 27,927.29 9 - 12 years 29,822.49 13 - 16 years 31,717.69 17 - 20 years 33,612.89 Over 21 years 35,415.39 (c)  For school attendance officers holding a master's degree in a behavioral science or a related field, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $26,382.29 5 - 8 years 29,008.79 9 - 12 years 31,109.99 13 - 16 years 33,211.19 17 - 20 years 35,312.39 Over 21 years 37,413.59 (d)  From and after July 1, 2026, each school attendance officer shall receive an annual salary supplement in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  The State Personnel Board shall adjust its salary scale for school attendance officers to reflect the supplement for purposes of minimum funding and uniformity. ( * * *78) * * *  (a)  Each school attendance officer employed by a district attorney on June 30, 1998, who became an employee of the State Department of Education on July 1, 1998, shall be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave for his continuous service as a school attendance officer under the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for personal leave shall be in an amount equal to one‑third (1/3) of the maximum personal leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25‑3‑93 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for major medical leave shall be in an amount equal to one‑half (1/2) of the maximum major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25‑3‑95 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency. However, if a district attorney who employed a school attendance officer on June 30, 1998, certifies, in writing, to the State Department of Education that the school attendance officer had accumulated, pursuant to a personal leave policy or major medical leave policy lawfully adopted by the district attorney, a number of days of unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, which is greater than the number of days to which the school attendance officer is entitled under this paragraph, the State Department of Education shall authorize the school attendance officer to retain the actual unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, certified by the district attorney, subject to the maximum amount of personal leave and major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Sections 25‑3‑93 and 25‑3‑95. (b) For the purpose of determining the accrual rate for personal leave under Section 25‑3‑93 and major medical leave under Section 25‑3‑95, the State Department of Education shall give consideration to all continuous service rendered by a school attendance officer before July 1, 1998, in addition to the service rendered by the school attendance officer as an employee of the department. (c) In order for a school attendance officer to be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave or to retain the actual unused personal leave and major medical leave accumulated by him before July 1, 1998, the district attorney who employed the school attendance officer must certify, in writing, to the State Department of Education the hire date of the school attendance officer. For each school attendance officer employed by the youth or family court or a state agency before being designated an employee of the district attorney who has not had a break in continuous service, the hire date shall be the date that the school attendance officer was hired by the youth or family court or state agency.  The department shall prescribe the date by which the certification must be received by the department and shall provide written notice to all district attorneys of the certification requirement and the date by which the certification must be received.  Each school attendance officer employed by the State Department of Education on June 30, 2026, shall be transferred from state services under the authority of the State Personnel Board to employment status as an employee of his or her respective school district of assignment.  Each school attendance officer shall have a work location within the school district served.  Each school attendance officer who became an employee of the school district on July 1, 2026, shall have no interruption of service with the Public Employees' Retirement System and the State and School Employees' Health Insurance Plan.  Any unused leave accumulated in state-service employment with the State Department of Education shall be transferred in accordance with Section 37-7-307, unless otherwise provided. ( * * *89) * * *  (a)  School attendance officers shall maintain regular office hours on a year-round basis, as determined by the school district of employment; however, during the school term, on those days that teachers in all of the school districts served by a school attendance officer are not required to report to work, the school attendance officer also shall not be required to report to work.  (For purposes of this subsection, a school district's school term is that period of time identified as the school term in contracts entered into by the district with licensed personnel.)  A school attendance officer shall be required to report to work on any day recognized as an official state holiday if teachers in any school district served by that school attendance officer are required to report to work on that day * * *, regardless of the school attendance officer's status as an employee of the State Department of Education, and compensatory leave may not be awarded to the school attendance officer for working during that day. However, a school attendance officer may be allowed by the school attendance officer's supervisor to use earned leave on such days. * * *  (b)  The State Department of Education annually shall designate a period of six (6) consecutive weeks in the summer between school years during which school attendance officers shall not be required to report to work.  A school attendance officer who elects to work at any time during that period may not be awarded compensatory leave for such work and may not opt to be absent from work at any time other than during the six (6) weeks designated by the department unless the school attendance officer uses personal leave or major medical leave accrued under Section 25‑3‑93 or 25‑3‑95 for such absence. ( * * *910)  The State Department of Education shall provide all continuing education and training courses that school attendance officers are required to complete under state law or rules and regulations of the department. SECTION 6.  Section 37-13-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-91.  (1)  This section shall be referred to as the "Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law." (2)  The following terms as used in this section are defined as follows: (a)  "Parent" means the father or mother to whom a child has been born, or the father or mother by whom a child has been legally adopted. (b) "Guardian" means a guardian of the person of a child, other than a parent, who is legally appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction. (c) "Custodian" means any person having the present care or custody of a child, other than a parent or guardian of the child. (d)  "School day" means not less than five and one-half (5-1/2) and not more than eight (8) hours of actual teaching in which both teachers and pupils are in regular attendance for scheduled schoolwork. (e)  "School" means any public school, including a charter school, in this state or any nonpublic school in this state which is in session each school year for at least one hundred eighty (180) school days, except that the "nonpublic" school term shall be the number of days that each school shall require for promotion from grade to grade. (f)  "Compulsory-school-age child" means a child who has attained or will attain the age of six (6) years on or before September 1 of the calendar year and who has not attained the age of seventeen (17) years on or before September 1 of the calendar year; and shall include any child who has attained or will attain the age of five (5) years on or before September 1 and has enrolled in a full-day public school kindergarten program. (g)  "School attendance officer" means a person employed by * * * the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 37‑13‑89 a local school district. (h)  "Appropriate school official" means the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, or, in the case of a nonpublic school, the principal or the headmaster. (i)  "Nonpublic school" means an institution for the teaching of children, consisting of a physical plant, whether owned or leased, including a home, instructional staff members and students, and which is in session each school year.  This definition shall include, but not be limited to, private, church, parochial and home instruction programs. (3)  A parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child in this state shall cause the child to enroll in and attend a public school or legitimate nonpublic school for the period of time that the child is of compulsory school age, except under the following circumstances: (a)  When a compulsory-school-age child is physically, mentally or emotionally incapable of attending school as determined by the appropriate school official based upon sufficient medical documentation. (b)  When a compulsory-school-age child is enrolled in and pursuing a course of special education, remedial education or education for children with physical or mental disadvantages or disabilities. (c)  When a compulsory-school-age child is being educated in a legitimate home instruction program. The parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child described in this subsection, or the parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child attending any charter school or nonpublic school, or the appropriate school official for any or all children attending a charter school or nonpublic school shall complete a "certificate of enrollment" in order to facilitate the administration of this section. The form of the certificate of enrollment shall be prepared by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education and shall be designed to obtain the following information only: (i)  The name, address, telephone number and date of birth of the compulsory-school-age child; (ii)  The name, address and telephone number of the parent, guardian or custodian of the compulsory-school-age child; (iii)  A simple description of the type of education the compulsory-school-age child is receiving and, if the child is enrolled in a nonpublic school, the name and address of the school; and (iv)  The signature of the parent, guardian or custodian of the compulsory-school-age child or, for any or all compulsory-school-age child or children attending a charter school or nonpublic school, the signature of the appropriate school official and the date signed. The certificate of enrollment shall be returned to the school attendance officer that serves the school district where the child resides on or before September 15 of each year.  Any parent, guardian or custodian found by the school attendance officer to be in noncompliance with this section shall comply, after written notice of the noncompliance by the school attendance officer, with this subsection within ten (10) days after the notice or be in violation of this section.  However, in the event the child has been enrolled in a public school within fifteen (15) calendar days after the first day of the school year as required in subsection (6), the parent or custodian may, at a later date, enroll the child in a legitimate nonpublic school or legitimate home instruction program and send the certificate of enrollment to the school attendance officer and be in compliance with this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, a legitimate nonpublic school or legitimate home instruction program shall be those not operated or instituted for the purpose of avoiding or circumventing the compulsory attendance law. (4)  An "unlawful absence" is an absence for an entire school day or during part of a school day by a compulsory-school-age child, which absence is not due to a valid excuse for temporary nonattendance.  For purposes of reporting absenteeism under subsection (6) of this section, if a compulsory-school-age child has an absence that is more than thirty-seven percent (37%) of the instructional day, as fixed by the school board for the school at which the compulsory-school-age child is enrolled, the child must be considered absent the entire school day. Days missed from school due to disciplinary suspension shall not be considered an "excused" absence under this section.  This subsection shall not apply to children enrolled in a nonpublic school. Each of the following shall constitute a valid excuse for temporary nonattendance of a compulsory-school-age child enrolled in a noncharter public school, provided satisfactory evidence of the excuse is provided to the superintendent of the school district, or his designee: (a)  An absence is excused when the absence results from the compulsory-school-age child's attendance at an authorized school activity with the prior approval of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee.  These activities may include field trips, athletic contests, student conventions, musical festivals and any similar activity. (b)  An absence is excused when the absence results from illness or injury which prevents the compulsory-school-age child from being physically able to attend school. (c)  An absence is excused when isolation of a compulsory-school-age child is ordered by the county health officer, by the State Board of Health or appropriate school official. (d)  An absence is excused when it results from the death or serious illness of a member of the immediate family of a compulsory-school-age child.  The immediate family members of a compulsory-school-age child shall include children, spouse, grandparents, parents, brothers and sisters, including stepbrothers and stepsisters. (e)  An absence is excused when it results from a medical or dental appointment of a compulsory-school-age child. (f)  An absence is excused when it results from the attendance of a compulsory-school-age child at the proceedings of a court or an administrative tribunal if the child is a party to the action or under subpoena as a witness. (g)  An absence may be excused if the religion to which the compulsory-school-age child or the child's parents adheres, requires or suggests the observance of a religious event.  The approval of the absence is within the discretion of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, but approval should be granted unless the religion's observance is of such duration as to interfere with the education of the child. (h)  An absence may be excused when it is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, that the purpose of the absence is to take advantage of a valid educational opportunity such as travel, including vacations or other family travel.  Approval of the absence must be gained from the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, before the absence, but the approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. (i)  An absence may be excused when it is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, that conditions are sufficient to warrant the compulsory-school-age child's nonattendance.  However, no absences shall be excused by the school district superintendent, or his designee, when any student suspensions or expulsions circumvent the intent and spirit of the compulsory attendance law. (j)  An absence is excused when it results from the attendance of a compulsory school age child participating in official organized events sponsored by the 4 H or Future Farmers of America (FFA).  The excuse for the 4 H or FFA event must be provided in writing to the appropriate school superintendent by the Extension Agent or High School Agricultural Instructor/FFA Advisor. (k)  An absence is excused when it results from the compulsory-school-age child officially being employed to serve as a page at the State Capitol for the Mississippi House of Representatives or Senate. (5)  Any parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child subject to this section who refuses or willfully fails to perform any of the duties imposed upon him or her under this section or who intentionally falsifies any information required to be contained in a certificate of enrollment, shall be guilty of contributing to the neglect of a child and, upon conviction, shall be punished in accordance with Section 97-5-39. Upon prosecution of a parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child for violation of this section, the presentation of evidence by the prosecutor that shows that the child has not been enrolled in school within eighteen (18) calendar days after the first day of the school year of the public school which the child is eligible to attend, or that the child has accumulated twelve (12) unlawful absences during the school year at the public school in which the child has been enrolled, shall establish a prima facie case that the child's parent, guardian or custodian is responsible for the absences and has refused or willfully failed to perform the duties imposed upon him or her under this section.  However, no proceedings under this section shall be brought against a parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child unless the school attendance officer has contacted promptly the home of the child and has provided written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance. (6)  If a compulsory-school-age child has not been enrolled in a school within fifteen (15) calendar days after the first day of the school year of the school which the child is eligible to attend or the child has accumulated five (5) unlawful absences during the school year of the public school in which the child is enrolled, the school district superintendent, or his designee, shall report, within two (2) school days or within five (5) calendar days, whichever is less, the absences to the school attendance officer.  The * * * State Department of Education school district shall prescribe a uniform method for schools to utilize in reporting the unlawful absences to the school attendance officer.  The superintendent, or his designee, also shall report any student suspensions or student expulsions to the school attendance officer when they occur. (7)  When a school attendance officer has made all attempts to secure enrollment and/or attendance of a compulsory-school-age child and is unable to effect the enrollment and/or attendance, the attendance officer shall file a petition with the youth court under Section 43-21-451 or shall file a petition in a court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child.  Sheriffs, deputy sheriffs and municipal law enforcement officers shall be fully authorized to investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children, and shall be authorized to file a petition with the youth court under Section 43-21-451 or file a petition or information in the court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child for violation of this section.  The youth court shall expedite a hearing to make an appropriate adjudication and a disposition to ensure compliance with the Compulsory School Attendance Law, and may order the child to enroll or re-enroll in school.  The superintendent of the school district to which the child is ordered may assign, in his discretion, the child to the alternative school program of the school established pursuant to Section 37-13-92. (8)  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations for the purpose of reprimanding any school superintendents who fail to timely report unexcused absences under the provisions of this section. (9)  Notwithstanding any provision or implication herein to the contrary, it is not the intention of this section to impair the primary right and the obligation of the parent or parents, or person or persons in loco parentis to a child, to choose the proper education and training for such child, and nothing in this section shall ever be construed to grant, by implication or otherwise, to the State of Mississippi, * * * any of its school attendance officers, agencies or subdivisions any right or authority to control, manage, supervise or make any suggestion as to the control, management or supervision of any private or parochial school or institution for the education or training of children, of any kind whatsoever that is not a public school according to the laws of this state; and this section shall never be construed so as to grant, by implication or otherwise, any right or authority to any state agency or other entity to control, manage, supervise, provide for or affect the operation, management, program, curriculum, admissions policy or discipline of any such school or home instruction program. SECTION 7.  Section 37-13-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-107.  (1)  Every school attendance officer shall be required annually to attend and complete a comprehensive course of training and education which is provided or approved by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education.  Attendance shall be required beginning with the first training seminar conducted after the school attendance officer is employed as a school attendance officer. (2)  The Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement shall provide or approve a course of training and education for school attendance officers of the state.  The course shall consist of at least twelve (12) hours of training per year.  The content of the course of training and when and where it is to be conducted shall be approved by the office.  A certificate of completion shall be furnished by the State Department of Education to those school attendance officers who complete the course.  Each certificate shall be made a permanent record of the * * * school attendance officer supervisor's office local school district where the school attendance officer is employed. (3)  Upon the failure of any person employed as a school attendance officer to receive the certificate of completion from the State Department of Education within the first year of his employment, the person shall not be allowed to carry out any of the duties of a school attendance officer and shall not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which the certificate has not been obtained. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.